Tennessee statutes. Title 28 Limitation Of Actions
Chapter 2

Limitation of Real Actions

28-2-101. Adverse possession — State conveyance.

Any person having had, either personally or through those through whom that person's claim arises, individually or through whom a person claims, seven (7) years' adverse possession of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments, granted by this state or the state of North Carolina, holding by conveyance, devise, grant, or other assurance of title, purporting to convey an estate in fee, without any claim by action at law or in equity commenced within that time and effectually prosecuted against such person is vested with a good and indefeasible title in fee to the land described in such person's assurance of title.

No title shall be vested by virtue of such adverse possession, unless such conveyance, devise, grant, or other assurance of title shall have been recorded in the register's office for the county or counties in which the land lies during the full term of such seven (7) years' adverse possession.

Code 1858, § 2763 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 28, § 1); Acts 1895, ch. 38, § 1; Shan., § 4456; Code 1932, § 8582; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-201.

Cross-References. Limitation of actions to test tax title, § 67-5-2504.

Limitation on forcible entry and detainer, § 29-18-109.

Presumption of ownership from possession of personal property, § 66-3-103.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 177.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-8-9.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 6; 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 2, 3, 9-18, 25, 30, 32, 34-38, 44, 49-58, 60, 63; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 97; 8 Tenn. Juris., Cotenancy, § 12; 9 Tenn. Juris., Deeds, § 7; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 47; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 3; 21 Tenn. Juris., Private Ways, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession Against Tenants in Common in Tennessee (Eston Wycliffe Orr), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 776.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

Adverse Possession — Purchaser Under An Oral Contract, 20 Tenn. L. Rev. 214.

Adverse Possession — Statutes — May One Acquire an Indefeasible Life Estate Under Tennessee Code Section 8582? 5 Vand. L. Rev. 818.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Bringing Tennessee into the Twentieth Century Re Possibilities of Reverter, Powers of Termination and Executory Interests When Used as Land Control Devices (Nicholas L. White), 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 555 (1985).

History of the Adverse Possession Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 673.

Real Property (Herman L. Trautman), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1080.

Real Property — Adverse Possession by Husband and Wife Does Not Ripen into a Tenancy by the Entirety, 10 Vand. L. Rev. 460.

Real Property — Adverse Possession — Cotenant Claims Title by Prescription Against Other Cotenants, 11 Vand. L. Rev. 645.

Real Property — Adverse Possession — Life Tenant Holding Against Remainderman, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 968.

Real Property — Adverse Possession — Tenancy in Common or Tenancy By Entirety?, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 892.

Real Property — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 921.

Real Property — 1956 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1089.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, IV. Transfers of Land (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 72.

Tacking Adverse Possessions in Tennessee, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 295.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

Title by Adverse Possession in Tennessee, 5 Vand. L. Rev. 621.

28-2-102. Action barred after seven years.

Any person, and those claiming under such person neglecting for the term of seven (7) years to avail themselves of the benefit of any title, legal or equitable, by action at law or in equity, effectually prosecuted against the person in possession, under recorded assurance of title, as in § 28-2-101, are forever barred.

Code 1858, § 2764 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 28, § 1); Acts 1895, ch. 38, § 2; Shan., § 4457; Code 1932, § 8583; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-202.

Cross-References. Adverse possession, state conveyance, § 28-2-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 3, 37, 44, 58, 63.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

28-2-103. Seven-year period runs from time right accrued — Extent of possession.

No person or anyone claiming under such person shall have any action, either at law or in equity, for the recovery of any lands, tenements or hereditaments, but within seven (7) years after the right of action accrued.

No possession of lands, tenements or hereditaments shall be deemed to extend beyond the actual possession of an adverse holder until the muniment of title, if any, under which such adverse holder claims such lands, tenements or hereditaments is duly recorded in the county in which the lands are located.

Code 1858, § 2765 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 28, § 2); Shan., § 4458; Code 1932, § 8584; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8584; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-203.

Cross-References. See case notes under §§ 28-2-101, 28-2-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 6; 1 Tenn. Juris., Advancements, § 5; 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 3, 9, 14, 15, 17, 18, 22, 25, 30, 32, 36, 37, 38, 41, 43, 53, 56, 58, 60, 63; 14 Tenn. Juris., Gifts, § 9; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 30; 18 Tenn. Juris., Liens, § 10; 21 Tenn. Juris., Private Ways, §§ 3, 6.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession Against Tenants in Common in Tennessee (Eston Wycliffe Orr), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 776.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

History of the Adverse Possession Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 673.

Nuisances — Permanent Injury — Limitations of Actions, 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 433.

Real Property — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Thomas G. Roady, Jr.), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1241.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

28-2-104. Application to school lands.

Sections 28-2-101 — 28-2-103 do not apply to lands, tenements, or hereditaments reserved for the use of schools.

Code 1858, § 2766 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 28, § 3); Shan., § 4459; Code 1932, § 8585; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-204.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 55.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

History of the Adverse Possession Statutes of Tennessee (R. D. Cox), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 673.

28-2-105. Adverse possession — Assurance of title.

Any person holding any real estate or land of any kind or any legal or equitable interest therein, and such person and those through whom such person claims having been in adverse possession of same for seven (7) years, where the real estate is held and claimed by such person or those through whom such person claims by a conveyance, devise, grant, a decree of a court of record, or other assurance of title purporting to convey an estate in fee, and such conveyance, devise, grant, or other assurance of title, has been recorded in the register's office of the county in which the land lies for a period of thirty (30) years or more or such decree entered on the minutes of such court for a period of thirty (30) years or more, is vested with an absolute and indefeasible title to such real estate or interest therein.

Acts 1923, ch. 90, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 4460a1; Code 1932, § 8586; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-205.

Cross-References. Adverse possession generally, §§ 28-2-101 — 28-2-103.

Presumption as to deed registered for 20 years, § 66-26-106.

Presumption as to deeds by attorney after 20 years' registration, §§ 66-26-108, 66-26-109.

Presumption as to subscription after 30 years' registration, § 66-26-107.

Statute not suspended by disability, § 28-1-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 3, 14, 29, 30, 51, 56, 57, 63.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession Against Tenants in Common in Tennessee (Eston Wycliffe Orr), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 776.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

Champerty as We Know It (R.D. Cox), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (1983).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, IV. Transfers of Land (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 72.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

28-2-106. Action for recovery prohibited.

Where such land or interest therein is held as set out in § 28-2-105, no person, whether upon disability or not, nor the state of Tennessee, shall commence or sustain an action for the recovery of same in any court.

Acts 1923, ch. 90, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 4460a2; Code 1932, § 8587; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-206.

Cross-References. Adverse possession, assurance of title, § 28-2-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 51.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

28-2-107. Rights under other laws preserved.

Nothing in § 28-2-105 or § 28-2-106 is to be construed as affecting any rights which any person may now or hereafter have under other laws in regard to limitation of actions for real estate where the limitation is for a period of less than thirty (30) years.

Acts 1923, ch. 90, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 4460a3; Code 1932, § 8588; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-207.

Law Reviews.

Adverse Possession and the Presumption of Title (R.D. Cox), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

28-2-108. Subordinate possession not adverse.

Possession is not adverse within the meaning of this chapter, as to any person claiming a right or interest in the land, when taken and continued under a title bond, mortgage or other instrument acknowledging that right or interest, or when taken and continued in subordination to the right or interest of another.

Code 1858, § 2768; Shan., § 4461; Code 1932, § 8589; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-208.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 25.

28-2-109. Presumption of ownership from payment of taxes.

Any person holding any real estate or land of any kind, or any legal or equitable interest therein, who has paid, or who and those through whom such person claims have paid, the state and county taxes on the same for more then twenty (20) years continuously prior to the date when any question arises in any of the courts of this state concerning the same, and who has had or who and those through whom such person claims have had, such person's deed, conveyance, grant or other assurance of title recorded in the register's office of the county in which the land lies, for such period of more than twenty (20) years, shall be presumed prima facie to be the legal owner of such land.

Acts 1947, ch. 28, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 9159.1 (Williams, § 9746.1); T.C.A. (orig.ed.), § 28-209.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 477.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 8, 28, 60, 63; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitation of Actions, § 17.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 300.12.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Real Property — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Wade H. Sides, Jr.), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1110.

The Tennessee Employer's Wrongful Discharge and the Union's Breach of the Duty of Fair Representation — Does Tennessee Need a Statute of Limitations? (Marsha H. Ashlock), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (1984).

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

28-2-110. Action barred by nonpayment of taxes.

Any person having any claim to real estate or land of any kind, or to any legal or equitable interest therein, the same having been subject to assessment for state and county taxes, who and those through whom such person claims have failed to have the same assessed and to pay any state and county taxes thereon for a period of more than twenty (20) years, shall be forever barred from bringing any action in law or in equity to recover the same, or to recover any rents or profits therefrom in any of the courts of this state.

This section does not apply to persons under eighteen (18) years of age or to persons adjudicated incompetent if suit shall be brought by them, or any one claiming through them, within three (3) years after legal rights are restored.

Nothing in this section shall bar a person from bringing an action to contest the lapse of a mineral interest within the period provided by § 66-5-108(j).

Acts 1947, ch. 28, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8585.1 (Williams, § 9159.1); impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-210; Acts 1987, ch. 282, § 6; 2011, ch. 47, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Preservation, or extinguishment and reversion of mineral interests, § 66-5-108.

Property taxes, classification and assessment, mineral interests, back assessments, location, § 67-5-809.

Property taxes, classification and assessment, records, identification and registration of mineral interests, § 67-5-804.

Property taxes, notice of sale of land, mineral interests, § 67-5-2502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 8, 39; 8 Tenn. Juris., Cotenancy, § 11; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity § 99; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitation of Actions, § 17; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 12.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Quiet Title Actions in Tennessee, 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 263 (1985).

28-2-111. Period of validity of liens — Extension.

Liens on realty, equitable or retained in favor of vendor on the face of the deed, also liens of mortgages, deeds of trust, and assignments of realty executed to secure debts, shall be barred, and the liens discharged, unless suits to enforce the same be brought within ten (10) years from the maturity of the debt.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to lands sold for school purposes, whereon liens have been retained for the payment of the purchase money, nor to persons under disability, until three (3) years after the removal of the same.

Original liens on realty retained in favor of vendors on the face of a deed, also original liens of mortgages, deeds of trust, and assignments of realty executed to secure debts, may be extended without their priority or legal effectiveness being in any way impaired, for any period of time agreed upon and beyond the ten-year period from the maturity of the obligation or debt, as provided for in subsection (a); such extension shall be evidenced by a written instrument, which shall, prior to or within ten (10) years from the maturity of the obligation or debt, be duly executed and acknowledged and be filed for record with the register of the county in which the realty affected is located and be there recorded, all in accordance with the statutes of this state in that regard; and when so filed for record such instrument of extension shall be constructive notice to all persons, as provided by the registration laws of this state; and such instrument shall contain a brief recital of the facts with reference to the original lien and shall provide that the lien shall continue, for a definite period of time in the future, to secure the remaining obligation or debt due under and secured by the original lien, and it shall not be necessary that there be any increase or decrease in the terms of the original obligation either of principal or interest.

Acts 1885, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4464, 4465; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8590, 8591; Acts 1943, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8590.1; T.C.A. (orig.ed.), §§ 28-212—28-214.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 3, 25, 62; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 40; 18 Tenn. Juris., Liens, §§ 10, 12; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 17; 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 50; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 68.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

28-2-112. Challenge of title of parcel conveyed pursuant to tax proceeding.

A person, and those claiming through such person, who receives title to a parcel conveyed pursuant to a tax proceeding is vested with an absolute and indefeasible title in fee in the parcel, unless a judicial action challenging the title of the parcel is filed in an appropriate court within three (3) years of the recording of the tax deed or order confirming the sale of the parcel in the office of the register of deeds for the county in which the parcel lies.

A person, and those claiming through such person, whether under disability or not, who fails or neglects to file a judicial action challenging the title of a parcel conveyed pursuant to a tax proceeding within three (3) years of the recording of the tax deed or order confirming the sale of the parcel in the office of the register of deeds for the county in which the parcel lies, is barred from challenging the title of the parcel.

The right to possession of a parcel pursuant to § 67-5-2503(a) constitutes adverse possession as to all other claimants of an interest in the parcel without any other action on the part of the person with the right to possession or the person's successors.

This section is applicable regardless of whether the instrument of conveyance in a tax proceeding is subsequently invalidated or declared void.

The three-year periods established in subsections (a) and (b) begin on July 1, 2017, as to parcels conveyed by tax deed or order confirming the sale prior to July 1, 2017.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal or limit the application of § 67-5-2504.

As used in this section:

“Judicial action challenging the title of the parcel” includes actions to invalidate the title and actions to declare the instrument conveying the title void for any reason. “Judicial action challenging the title of the parcel” also includes motions, suits to quiet title or for declaratory judgment, and any other means or court proceeding by which the title to the parcel may be attacked; and

“Proceeding” has the same meaning as defined in § 67-5-2502(c)(1).

Acts 2017, ch. 299, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 299, § 20. July 1, 2017.